Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2005
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; complaint; summons and service.

It will be sufficient that the summons require the accused to appear and answer to the complaint of .......... (naming the accuser) for official misdemeanor, but a copy of the complaint must be served with the summons.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 5, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5702;

C.S.1922, § 5032;

C.S.1929, § 26-1705;

R.S.1943, § 23-2005.